Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.420.005

Purpose.

The purpose of this compact is to facilitate the mobility of teachers across the member states, with the goal of supporting teachers through a new pathway to licensure. Through this compact, the member states seek to establish a collective regulatory framework that expedites and enhances the ability of teachers to move across state lines. This compact is intended to achieve the following objectives and should be interpreted accordingly. The member states hereby ratify the same intentions by subscribing hereto:

(1) Create a streamlined pathway to licensure mobility for teachers;

(2) Support the relocation of eligible military spouses;

(3) Facilitate and enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, and disciplinary information between the member states;

(4) Enhance the power of state and district level education officials to hire qualified, competent teachers by removing barriers to the employment of out-of-state teachers;

(5) Support the retention of teachers in the profession by removing barriers to relicensure in a new state; and

(6) Maintain state sovereignty in the regulation of the teaching profession.

[ 2024 c 317 s 1.]